Utah statutes.
26-18-19.   Medicaid vision services -- Request for proposals.

The department may select one or more contractors in accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 6a, Utah Procurement Code, to provide vision services to all Medicaid populations without restricting provider participation, and within existing appropriations from the Legislature.



Enacted by Chapter 366, 2013 General Session

